Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 9
PAPER BALLOTS

31-10-901. Ballot boxes.

The governing body of each municipality using paper ballots shall provide one ballot box for each polling place. Each ballot box shall be strongly constructed so as to prevent tampering, with a small opening at the top thereof and with a lid to be locked. The ballot boxes and keys shall be kept by the clerk and delivered to the judges of election within one day immediately preceding any municipal election, to be returned as provided in section 31-10-614. Nothing in this section shall prevent the governing body from obtaining ballot boxes from the office of the county clerk and recorder.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1058, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1505, § 26, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-507 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-902. Ballots.

The clerk of each municipality using paper ballots shall provide printed ballots for every municipal election. The official ballots shall be printed and in the possession of the clerk at least ten days before the election. In addition, sample ballots shall be printed and in the possession of the clerk ten days before the election and shall be subject to public inspection. The sample ballots shall be printed in the form of the official ballots but upon paper of a different color from the official ballots. Sample ballots shall be delivered to the judges of election and posted with the cards of instruction provided in section 31-10-906.

Every ballot shall contain the names of all duly nominated candidates for offices to be voted for at that election, except those who have died or withdrawn, and the ballot shall contain no other names. The names of the candidates for each office shall be printed upon the ballot without political party designation and without any title or degree designating the business or profession of the candidate. The names shall be arranged by lot as prescribed by the municipal clerk under the designation of the office.

The ballots shall be printed to give each voter a clear opportunity to designate his choice of candidates by a cross mark (X) in the square at the right of the name. On the ballot may be printed such words as will aid the voter, such as "vote for not more than one".

At the end of the list of candidates for each different office shall be as many blank spaces as there are persons to be elected to such office in which the voter may write the name of any eligible person not printed on the ballot for whom he desires to vote as a candidate for such office; but no cross mark (X) shall be required at the right of the name so written in.

When the approval of any question is submitted at a municipal election, such question shall be printed upon the ballot after the lists of candidates for all offices. The ballots shall be printed to give each voter a clear opportunity to designate his answer by a cross mark (X) in the appropriate square at the right of the question.

The extreme top part of each ballot shall be divided by two perforated lines into two spaces, each of which shall be not less than an inch in width, the top portion being known as the stub and the next portion as the duplicate stub. Upon each of said stubs nothing shall be printed except the number of the ballot, and the same number shall be printed upon both stubs. Stubs and duplicate stubs of ballots shall both be numbered consecutively. The requirements of this subsection (4)(a) do not apply to ballots used in mail ballot elections.

All ballots shall be uniform and of sufficient length and width to allow for the names of candidates and the proposed questions to be printed in clear, plain type with a space of at least one-half inch between the different columns on said ballot. On the back of each ballot shall be printed the endorsement "Official ballot for....", and after the word "for" shall follow the designation of the precinct, ward, and municipality for which the ballot is prepared, the date of the election, and a facsimile of the signature of the clerk who has caused the ballot to be printed. The ballot shall contain no caption or other endorsement or number. Each clerk shall use precisely the same quality and tint of paper, the same kind of type, and the same quality and tint of plain black ink for all ballots furnished by him at one election. When candidates are to be voted for only by the registered electors of a particular ward, the names of such candidates shall not be printed on any other ballots than those provided for use in such ward. The ballots shall be of such form that when folded the whole endorsement is visible and the contents of the ballot are not exposed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1058, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1710, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(4) amended, (HB 20-1156), ch. 51, p. 177, § 2, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-508 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-903. Ballots changed if candidate dies or withdraws.

If any person duly nominated dies before the day fixed for the election and the fact of such death becomes known to the clerk or withdraws by filing an affidavit of withdrawal with the clerk before the date fixed for election, the name of the deceased or withdrawn candidate shall not be printed upon the ballots for the election. If the ballots are already printed, the name of the deceased candidate or withdrawn candidate shall be erased or canceled, if possible, before the ballots are delivered to the voters.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1059, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 756, § 27, effective April 4.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2178, § 41, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-509 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-904. Printing and distribution of ballots.

In municipalities using paper ballots, the clerk shall cause to be printed and distributed to the election judges in the respective precincts a sufficient number of ballots. The ballots shall be sent in one or more sealed packages for each precinct with marks on the outside of each clearly stating the precinct and polling place for which it is intended, together with the number of ballots enclosed. Such packages shall be delivered to one of the judges of election of such precinct between the close of business on the Friday preceding election day or during any earlier day in which a judges' school of instruction is held, and 8 p.m. on the Monday before election day. A receipt for the ballots thus delivered shall be given by the election judge who receives them. The receipt shall be filed with the clerk, who shall also keep a record of the time when and the manner in which each of said packages was sent and delivered. The election judge receiving such package shall produce the same, with the seal unbroken, in the proper polling place at the opening of the polls on election day and, in the presence of all election judges for the precinct, shall open the package.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1060, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1506, § 27, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-510 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-905. Substitute ballots.

If the ballots to be furnished to any election judge are not delivered by 8 p.m. on the Monday before election day or if after delivery they are destroyed or stolen, the clerk shall cause other ballots to be prepared, as nearly in the form prescribed as practicable, with the word "substitute" printed in brackets immediately under the facsimile signature of the clerk. Upon receipt of ballots thus prepared, accompanied by a written and sworn statement of the clerk that the same have been so prepared and furnished by him and that the original ballots have so failed to be received or have been destroyed or stolen, the election judges shall cause the ballots so substituted to be used at the election. If from any cause none of the official ballots or substitute ballots prepared by the clerk are ready for distribution at any polling place or if the supply of ballots is exhausted before the polls are closed, unofficial ballots, printed or written, made as nearly as possible in the form of the official ballots, may be used until substitutes prepared by the clerk are printed and delivered.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1060, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-511 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-906. Cards of instruction.

The clerk shall furnish to the judges of election of each precinct a sufficient number of instruction cards for the guidance of voters in preparing their ballots. The election judges shall post at least one card in each polling place upon the day of the election. Such cards shall be printed in large, clear type and shall contain full instructions to the voter as to what should be done:

To obtain ballots for voting;

To prepare the ballot for deposit in the ballot box;

To obtain a new ballot in the place of one spoiled by accident or mistake; and

To obtain assistance in marking ballots.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1060, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-512 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-907. Definitions.

As used in sections 31-10-908 to 31-10-913, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible elector" means a person who is a registered elector, as defined in section 31-1-101 (9).

"Mail ballot election" means an election for which eligible electors may cast ballots by mail and in accordance with this part 9.

"Mail ballot packet" means the packet of information provided by the clerk to eligible electors in a mail ballot election. The packet includes the ballot, instructions for completing the ballot, a secrecy envelope, and a return envelope.

"Return envelope" means an envelope that is printed with spaces for the name and address of, and a self-affirmation to be signed by, an eligible elector voting in a mail ballot election, that contains a secrecy envelope and ballot, and that is designed to allow election officials, upon examining the signature, name, and address on the outside of the envelope, to determine whether the enclosed ballot is being submitted by an eligible elector who has not previously voted in that particular election.

"Secrecy envelope" means the envelope or sleeve used for a mail ballot election that contains the eligible elector's ballot for the election and that is designed to conceal and maintain the confidentiality of the elector's vote until the counting of votes for that particular election.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 61, § 20, effective February 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-908. Mail ballot elections - preelection process.

If the governing body of a municipality determines that an election is to be conducted by mail ballot, the clerk shall supervise the distributing, handling, counting of ballots, and the survey of returns and shall take all necessary steps to protect the confidentiality of the ballots cast and the integrity of the election.

Official ballots must be prepared and all other preelection procedures followed as otherwise provided by this article; except that mail ballot packets must be prepared in accordance with this part 9.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 62, § 20, effective February 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-909. Nomination of candidates in mail ballot elections.

Any person who desires to be a candidate for a municipal office in a mail ballot election conducted pursuant to this part 9 after May 1, 2014, shall comply with the nominating procedures set forth in this article 10; except that:

Any nominating petition in a mail ballot election may be circulated and signed beginning on the ninety-first day prior to the election and must be filed with the municipal clerk no later than the close of business on the seventy-first day prior to the election. The petition may be amended to correct or replace signatures that the clerk finds are not in apparent conformity with the requirements of this article 10 by filing such changes anytime prior to sixty-three days before the day of the election.

Any person who has been nominated and who has accepted a nomination may cause his or her name to be withdrawn from such nomination at any time prior to sixty-three days before the election by a written affidavit withdrawing from such nomination. The affidavit stating withdrawal shall be signed by the candidate and filed with the clerk.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 62, § 20, effective February 18.

L. 2018:

(1)(c) repealed, (SB 18-107), ch. 104, p. 789, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(b) amended, (HB 20-1156), ch. 51, p. 177, § 3, effective September 14.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 18-107, see section 1 of chapter 104, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

31-10-910. Procedures for conducting mail ballot election.

No later than thirty days prior to election day, the county clerk and recorder shall submit to the clerk conducting the mail ballot election a complete preliminary list of registered electors.

No later than twenty days prior to election day, the county clerk and recorder shall submit to the clerk a supplemental list of the names of eligible electors who registered to vote on or before twenty-two days before the election whose names were not included on the preliminary list.

All lists of registered electors provided to a clerk under this section must include the last mailing address of each elector.

Not sooner than twenty-two days before an election, and no later than fifteen days before an election, the clerk shall mail to each active eligible elector, at the last mailing address appearing in the registration records and in accordance with United States postal service regulations, a mail ballot packet marked "Do not forward. Address correction requested.", or any other similar statement that is in accordance with United States postal service regulations.

A ballot or ballot label must contain the following warning:

A return envelope must have printed on it a self-affirmation substantially in the following form:

The signing of the self-affirmation on the return envelope described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) constitutes an affirmation by the eligible elector, under penalty of perjury, that the facts stated in the self-affirmation are true. If the eligible elector is unable to sign, the eligible elector may affirm by making a mark on the self-affirmation, with or without assistance, witnessed by another person.

A return envelope is not required to have a flap covering the signature.

No sooner than twenty-two days prior to election day, and until 7 p.m. on election day, mail ballots must be made available at the clerk's office for eligible electors who request a ballot.

An eligible elector may obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot was destroyed, spoiled, lost, or for some other reason not received by the eligible elector. An eligible elector may obtain a ballot if a mail ballot packet was not sent to the elector because the eligibility of the elector could not be determined at the time the mail ballot packets were mailed. In order to obtain a ballot in such cases, the eligible elector must sign a sworn statement specifying the reason for requesting the ballot. The statement must be presented to the clerk no later than 7 p.m. on election day. The clerk shall keep a record of each ballot issued in accordance with this paragraph (e) together with a list of each ballot obtained pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection (2).

The clerk shall not transmit a mail ballot packet under this paragraph (e) unless a sworn statement requesting the ballot is received on or before election day. A ballot may be transmitted directly to the eligible elector requesting the ballot at the clerk's office or may be mailed to the eligible elector at the address provided in the sworn statement. Ballots may be cast no later than 7 p.m. on election day.

Upon receipt of a ballot, the eligible elector shall mark the ballot, sign and complete the self-affirmation on the return envelope, and comply with the instructions provided with the ballot.

The eligible elector may return the marked ballot to the clerk by United States mail or by depositing the ballot at the office of the clerk or any place designated as a depository by the clerk. The ballot must be returned in the return envelope. If an eligible elector returns the ballot by mail, the elector must provide postage. The ballot must be received at the clerk's office or a designated depository, which must remain open until 7 p.m. on election day. The depository must be designated by the clerk and located in a secure place under the supervision of the clerk, an election judge, or another person designated by the clerk.

Once the ballot is returned, an election judge shall first qualify the submitted ballot by comparing the information on the return envelope with the registration records to determine whether the ballot was submitted by an eligible elector who has not previously voted in the election. If the ballot so qualifies and is otherwise valid, the election judge shall indicate in the pollbook that the eligible elector cast a ballot and deposit the ballot in an official ballot box.

(4.5) The signature of the eligible elector on the self-affirmation on the return envelope must be compared with the signature of the eligible elector on file in the statewide voter registration system, created in section 1-2-301, C.R.S., in accordance with section 31-10-910.3.

All deposited ballots must be counted as provided in this article. A mail ballot is valid and counted only if it is returned in the return envelope, the self-affirmation on the return envelope is signed and completed by the eligible elector to whom the ballot was issued, and the information on the return envelope is verified in accordance with subsection (4) of this section. Mail ballots must be counted in the same manner provided by section 31-10-610 for counting paper ballots or section 31-10-811 for counting electronic ballots. If the election official determines that an eligible elector to whom a replacement ballot has been issued has voted more than once, the first ballot returned by the elector is considered the elector's official ballot. Rejected ballots are handled in the same manner as provided in section 31-10-612.

WARNING:

Any person who, by use of force or other means, unduly influences an eligible elector to vote in any particular manner or to refrain from voting, or who falsely makes, alters, forges, or counterfeits any mail ballot before or after it has been cast, or who destroys, defaces, mutilates, or tampers with a ballot is subject, upon conviction, to imprisonment, or to a fine, or both.

State of .... Municipality of ...., County of ....
I, ...., affirm and say that I am a qualified and registered elector in the municipality of .... and state of Colorado; that my residence and post office address is ....; and that I herein enclose my ballot in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965". I realize that if any false statements are contained herein that I shall be subject to prosecution for criminal action.
.............................. :u2100 ..............................
Date :u2100 Signature of voter

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 63, § 20, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(4.5) added, (HB 16-1070), ch. 130, p. 373, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2020:

(2)(c)(I) amended, (HB 20-1156), ch. 51, p. 178, § 4, effective September 14.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-910.3. Verification of signatures - signature verification devices - procedures - training - definitions.

In every mail ballot election conducted after March 30, 2018, an election judge shall, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), compare the signature on the self-affirmation on each return envelope with the signature of the eligible elector stored in the statewide voter registration system in accordance with this section.

A clerk may allow an election judge to use a signature verification device to compare the signature on the self-affirmation on a return envelope of an eligible elector's ballot with the signature of the elector stored in the statewide voter registration system in accordance with this section.

The election judges must compare the signature on the self-affirmation on each return envelope with the signature provided by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-2-301, C.R.S. The election judges must research the signature further if there is:

An obvious change in the signature's slant;

A printed signature on one document and a cursive signature on the other document;

A difference in the signature's size or scale;

A difference in the signature's individual characteristics, such as how the "t's" are crossed, "i's" are dotted, or loops are made on "y's" or "j's";

A difference in the elector's signature style, such as how the letters are connected at the top and bottom;

Evidence that ballots or envelopes from the same household have been switched; or

Any other noticeable discrepancy such as misspelled names.

If an election judge must conduct further research on an elector's signature, he or she must check the additional signatures provided by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-2-301, C.R.S., if available.

An election judge may compare additional information written by the elector on the return envelope, such as the elector's address and date of signing. Any similarities noted when comparing other information may be used as part of the signature verification decision process.

If an election judge determines that an elector inadvertently returned his or her ballot in another household member's ballot return envelope, the election judge must process and prepare the ballot of the elector who signed the self-affirmation for counting if it is otherwise valid. The election judge need not send a signature verification discrepancy letter to the elector.

If the election judges dispute the signature, they must document the discrepancy and the research steps taken in a log that identifies the elector only by name and elector identification number, does not contain the elector's signature, notes the final resolution and ballot disposition, and identifies the election judges responsible for the final resolution and ballot disposition.

If the election judge determines that the signature of an eligible elector on the self-affirmation matches the elector's signature stored in the statewide voter registration system, the election judge shall follow the procedures specified in section 31-10-910 (5) concerning the qualification and counting of mail ballots.

If a signature verification device used pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section determines that the signature on the self-affirmation on a return envelope of an eligible elector's ballot matches the signature of the elector stored in the statewide voter registration system, the signature on the self-affirmation is deemed verified, and the election judge shall follow the procedures specified in section 31-10-910 (5) concerning the qualification and counting of mail ballots.

If, upon comparing the signature of an eligible elector on the self-affirmation on the return envelope with the signature of the eligible elector stored in the statewide voter registration system, the election judge determines that the signatures do not match, or if a signature verification device used pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section is unable to determine that the signatures match, two other election judges shall simultaneously compare the signatures and proceed according to subsection (5) of this section.

If the two other election judges specified in subsection (4) of this section agree that the signature of an eligible elector on the self-affirmation matches the elector's signature stored in the statewide voter registration system, the initial election judge shall follow the procedures specified in section 31-10-910 (5) concerning the qualification and counting of mail ballots.

In the case of a disagreement between the two other election judges as to whether the signature of an eligible elector on the self-affirmation on the return envelope matches the signature of the eligible elector stored in the statewide voter registration system pursuant to the procedures specified in subsection (4) of this section, the signatures are deemed to match, and the initial election judge shall follow the procedures specified in section 31-10-910 (5) concerning the qualification and counting of mail ballots.

If both other election judges agree that the signatures do not match, the clerk shall, within three days after the signature deficiency has been confirmed, but in no event later than two days after election day, send to the eligible elector at the address indicated in the registration records a letter explaining the discrepancy in signatures and a form for the eligible elector to confirm that the elector returned a ballot to the clerk.

If the clerk receives the form within eight days after election day confirming that the elector returned a ballot to the clerk, and if the ballot is otherwise valid, the ballot must be counted.

If the eligible elector returns the form indicating that the elector did not return a ballot to the clerk, or if the eligible elector does not return the form within eight days after election day, the self-affirmation on the return envelope must be categorized as incorrect, and the ballot shall not be counted. An original return envelope with an enclosed secrecy envelope containing a voted ballot that is not counted in accordance with this sub-subparagraph (B) must be stored in the office of the clerk in a secure location separate from valid return envelopes and may be removed only by order of a court having jurisdiction.

An election judge shall not determine that the signature of an eligible elector on the self-affirmation does not match the signature of that eligible elector stored in the statewide voter registration system solely on the basis of substitution of initials or use of a common nickname.

The clerk shall provide training in the techniques and standards of signature comparison to election judges who compare signatures pursuant to this section.

As used in this section, "statewide voter registration system" means the statewide voter registration system created pursuant to section 1-2-301, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1070), ch. 130, p. 370, § 1, effective August 10.

31-10-911. Counting mail ballots.

The election officials at the mail ballot counting center may receive and prepare mail ballots delivered and turned over to them by the clerk for counting. Counting of the mail ballots may begin fifteen days prior to the election and continue until counting is completed. The election official in charge of the mail ballot counting center shall take all precautions necessary to ensure the secrecy of the counting procedures, and the election officials or watchers shall not release any information concerning the count until after 7 p.m. on election day.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 65, § 20, effective February 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-912. Write-in candidate affidavit in mail ballot elections.

No write-in vote for any office shall be counted unless an affidavit of intent to be a write-in candidate has been filed with the clerk by the person wishing to be a write-in candidate not later than sixty-four days before the day of the election. The affidavit of intent must indicate the office to which the affiant desires election and that the affiant is qualified to assume the office if elected.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 65, § 20, effective February 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-913. Challenges.

Any mail ballot election held pursuant to this part 9 shall not be invalidated on the grounds that an eligible elector did not receive a ballot so long as the clerk acted in good faith in complying with the provisions of this part 9.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 65, § 20, effective February 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.